Utah statutes.
40-1-10.   Certified copies of records evidence.

Copies of notices of location of mining claims, mill sites and tunnel sites heretofore recorded in the records of the several mining districts, and copies of the mining rules and regulations in force therein and recorded, when duly certified by the district or county recorder, shall be receivable in all tribunals and before all officers of this state as prima facie evidence.



No Change Since 1953

